Utah statutes.
31A-22-1701.   Title -- Scope of part.

(1)  This part is known as the "Property and Casualty Certificate of Insurance Act."

(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), this part applies to a certificate of insurance issued on or after May 10, 2011, as evidence of insurance coverage on property, operations, or risks located in this state.

(b)  This part applies on and after July 1, 2012, to a certificate of insurance that is issued as evidence of insurance coverage on property, operations, or risks located in this state if the certificate of insurance is an exhibit to a contract executed before July 1, 2012.

(c)  This part applies, regardless of where located, to the following in relation to a certificate of insurance described in Subsection (2)(b):

(i)  a certificate holder;

(ii)  a policyholder;

(iii)  an insurer; or

(iv)  an insurance producer.



Enacted by Chapter 253, 2011 General Session

